Utah statutes.
54-1-6.5.   Executive staff director -- Appointment -- Functions.

The commission shall appoint an executive staff director, who shall serve at the pleasure of the commission and shall supervise and coordinate staff functions, assist the chairman of the commission with administrative duties, and perform any other duties the commission may direct.



Enacted by Chapter 246, 1983 General Session

